Tennessee, session 114, SB2191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 51, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
7-51-2801. Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Developer" means a developer of real property seeking approval
from a political subdivision to construct a private development within the
jurisdiction of the political subdivision;
(2) "Development" means a private construction project involving the
improvement of real property;
(3) "Offsite public infrastructure improvement" means a public
infrastructure improvement or utility extension beyond the boundary of real
property being developed by a developer;
(4) "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality, or metropolitan
government; and
(5) "Public infrastructure" means roads, streets, traffic signals, turn lanes,
sidewalks, lighting, stormwater improvements, and utilities, including water,
wastewater, electric, gas, and broadband, that will be dedicated to one (1) or
more public entities.
7-51-2802. Cost-sharing agreements for public infrastructure.
SB2191
012035
- 1 -

(a) If a political subdivision of this state determines that an offsite public
infrastructure improvement is necessary as part of a development project to service
future development, then the political subdivision may require the developer to construct
or pay for the construction of such offsite public infrastructure improvements subject to a
cost-sharing arrangement between the developer and the political subdivision. Such
cost-sharing arrangement must be based upon the proportionate utilization or impact the
development for which approval is sought from the political subdivision has on public
infrastructure.
(b) A political subdivision has sixty (60) days from the date on which the
approval is requested from the political subdivision by which to make a determination
under subsection (a).
(c) If the developer and the political subdivision are unable to agree upon the
amount of a cost-sharing arrangement as described under subsection (a), then the
owner may request the Tennessee board of utility regulation, created pursuant to § 7-82-
701, to determine the cost-sharing amount.
(d) The political subdivision's share of the offsite public infrastructure
improvement costs may be provided through impact fees collected from other
developments, bond proceeds, or unencumbered tax revenues.
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012035